Hawaii statutes.
[§443B-4.55] Single act; evidence of
practice. Evidence that a collection agency has committed any act which is
prohibited by this chapter shall be sufficient to justify the remedies set
forth in this chapter, without proof of a general course of conduct. [L 1990, c
246, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next